test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_C_makizin_gt-glossing.yaml
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: makzinenymishbaniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: makzinenymishbaniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: makzinensmishbaniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: makzinensmishbaniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: makzinensmishbaniin
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: makzinenymishbaniin
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: makzinenymishbaniing
     X+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: makzinenymishbaniin
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: makzinensmishbaniin
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: makzinensmishbaniing
     X+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: makzinensmishbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakzinenyminaanbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakzinenyminaanbaniing
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakzinenyminaanbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakzinensminaanbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakzinensminaanbaniing
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakzinensminaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinenyminaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinenyminaanbaniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinenyminaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinenymiwaabniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinenymiwaabniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinenymiwaabniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinensminaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinensminaanbaniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinensminaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinensmiwaabniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinensmiwaabniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinensmiwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: makzinenymiwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makzinenymiwaabniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makzinenymiwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: makzinenyminwibniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: makzinenyminwibniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Pl: makzinenyminwibniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: makzinensmiwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makzinensmiwaabniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makzinensmiwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: makzinensminwibniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: makzinensminwibniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Pl: makzinensminwibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakzinenyshinaanbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakzinenyshinaanbaniing
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakzinenyshinaanbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakzinensshinaanbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakzinensshinaanbaniing
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakzinensshinaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinenyshinaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinenyshinaanbaniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinenyshinaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinenyshiwaabniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinenyshiwaabniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinenyshiwaabniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinensshinaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinensshinaanbaniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinensshinaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinensshiwaabniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinensshiwaabniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinensshiwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: makzinenyshiwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makzinenyshiwaabniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makzinenyshiwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: makzinenyshinwibniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: makzinenyshinwibniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: makzinenyshinwibniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: makzinensshiwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makzinensshiwaabniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makzinensshiwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: makzinensshinwibniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: makzinensshinwibniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: makzinensshinwibniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakzinmishnaanbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakzinmishnaanbaniing
     1+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakzinmishnaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinmishnaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinmishnaanbaniing
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinmishnaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinmishwaabniin
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinmishwaabniing
     2+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinmishwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: makzinmishwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makzinmishwaabniing
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makzinmishwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: makzinmishniwbaniin
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: makzinmishniwbaniing
     3+mkizin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: makzinmishniwbaniin
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakzinenymishnaanbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakzinenymishnaanbaniing
     1+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakzinenymishnaanbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nmakzinensmishnaanbaniin
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nmakzinensmishnaanbaniing
     1+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nmakzinensmishnaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinenymishnaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinenymishnaanbaniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinenymishnaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinenymishwaabniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinenymishwaabniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinenymishwaabniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinensmishnaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinensmishnaanbaniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinensmishnaanbaniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gmakzinensmishwaabniin
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gmakzinensmishwaabniing
     2+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gmakzinensmishwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: makzinenymishwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makzinenymishwaabniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makzinenymishwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: makzinenymishniwbaniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: makzinenymishniwbaniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: makzinenymishniwbaniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: makzinensmishwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: makzinensmishwaabniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: makzinensmishwaabniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: makzinensmishniwbaniin
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: makzinensmishniwbaniing
     3+mkizin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: makzinensmishniwbaniin
     
